Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.170

Board of trustees—Quorum.

A majority of the trustees shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

[ 1984 c 26 s 14; 1963 c 4 s 36.62.170. Prior: 1931 c 139 s 4, part; RRS s 6090-12, part.]